apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="মর__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেনে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ো</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োনা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িস</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িসনে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেন</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেননা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেনা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেন</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেননা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেনা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ব</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বনা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেনা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বি</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বিনা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেন</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেননা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেনা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেন</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>বেননা</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>া</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ার</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিল</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েনি</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিলাম</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িনি</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিলে</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>নি</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিলি</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>িসনি</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিলেন</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েননি</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েছিল</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>েনি</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>

    <e lm="ধর"><i>ধর</i><par n="মর__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="মর"><i>মর</i><par n="মর__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="পড়"><i>পড়</i><par n="মর__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="কর"><i>কর</i><par n="মর__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="চল"><i>চল</i><par n="মর__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘট"><i>ঘট</i><par n="মর__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="উঠ"><i>উঠ</i><par n="মর__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="বল"><i>বল</i><par n="মর__vblex"/></e>
